Washington, session 2025-2026, HB1681.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 1. The legislature finds that the installation of ductless mini-split systems has increased across the state as more customers look toward these systems for inexpensive, zonal heating and cooling. Energy codes and other laws pushing for more electrification of homes are also driving the move towards these HVAC systems. The legislature further finds that HVAC/refrigeration specialty electricians are trained and can safely connect the indoor units to the installed outdoor units in residential and multifamily homes, as the circuits are specified by the manufacturer, the type of cable used is standardized by manufacturers, and the terminals on both ends are coded. This is more cost-effective for consumers and efficient for home builders. It is also important to allow specialty electricians to do this type of work since there currently is a shortage of certified electricians in the state. The legislature therefore intends to update the scope of work for HVAC/refrigeration specialty electricians to allow them to install, repair, replace, or maintain branch circuits from the outdoor unit to the indoor unit or units of a split ductless HVAC system in residential and multifamily homes and other appropriate construction classifications designated by the department of labor and industries.NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 2. A new section is added to chapter 19.28 RCW to read as follows:(1) The scope of work for the HVAC/refrigeration specialty or specialties involves installing, repairing, replacing, or maintaining HVAC/refrigeration systems and related equipment as specified by rules adopted by the department under this chapter.(2) In addition to the scope of work specified in rules as provided under subsection (1) of this section, for ductless mini-split HVAC/refrigeration systems installed for one and two-family dwellings, multifamily dwellings of types III, IV, or V construction when there are not more than six stories of multifamily dwellings of types III, IV, or V construction above grade or above types I or II construction or installed for other than residential occupancies that have no more than three stories on or above grade, and other construction types so designated by the department, the scope of work for specialties under this section must include the installation, repair, replacement, and maintenance of the following:(a) Single phase circuits not exceeding 250 volts or 20 amps when those circuits are supplied from supplementary overcurrent devices in outdoor compressor or condenser units and distribution controllers of mini-split HVAC/refrigeration systems;(b) Wiring for condensate pumps connected to single phase branch circuits under (a) of this subsection when wiring is connected in accordance with the manufacturer's instructions for the mini-split HVAC/refrigeration system;(c) Disconnect switches and device, pull, and junction boxes, conduit bodies, and fittings when used for single phase circuits allowed under (a) of this subsection; and(d) Raceway or conduit systems for single phase branch circuits allowed under this section when the raceway or conduit system is installed outside of a building or when the raceway or conduit system is no more than six feet in length when connected to equipment located indoors.(3) In order for work to be covered by subsection (2)(a) through (d) of this section, the HVAC/refrigeration equipment installed must be certified for use as a system by an electrical product testing laboratory accredited by the department, and the manufacturer's instructions provided for the system must include specifications for type and size of wiring between outdoor compressor and condenser units, distribution controllers, and indoor evaporators.(4) This section does not modify or limit the department's authority to modify the scope of work for specialties under this section, provided that the scope of work does not exclude those specialties from conducting the work described in subsection (2) of this section.--- END ---